District of Columbia statutes.
16-2355

Consideration of termination of the parent and child relationship at review hearings.

(a)

After a child adjudicated neglected by the Division pursuant to this chapter has been committed by the Division to the custody of a department, agency or institution for more than eighteen (18) months and no hearing on a motion for the termination of the parent and child relationship has been held within the preceding twelve (12) months, the Division shall, at a review hearing, determine why a motion to terminate the parent and child relationship has not been filed.

(b)

For each child who remains in custody for three (3) years or more, the Division shall, at each annual review hearing, determine why a motion to terminate the parent and child relationships has not been filed.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 410, 24 DCR 3341
1981 Ed., § 16-2355.
1973 Ed., § 16-2355.